Missouri, session 2026, HB2999.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 336.010, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 336.010, to read as follows:
336.010. 1. The "practice of optometry" is the examination, diagnosis, treatment, and
preventative care of the eye, adnexa, and vision. The practice includes, but is not limited to:
(1) The examination of the eye, adnexa, and vision to determine the accommodative
and refractive states, visual perception, conditions, and diseases;
(2) The diagnosis and treatment of conditions or diseases of the eye, adnexa, and
vision;
(3) The performance of diagnostic procedures and ordering of laboratory and imaging
tests for the diagnosis of vision and conditions and diseases of the eye and adnexa;
(4) The prescription and administration of pharmaceutical agents, including
epinephrine delivery devices but excluding injectable agents, for the purpose of
examination, diagnosis, and treatment of vision and conditions or diseases of the eye and
adnexa;
(5) The performance of the following procedures:
(a) The removal of superficial foreign bodies from the eye or adnexa;
(b) The removal of embedded foreign bodies from the eye or eyelid;
(c) The removal of corneal foreign bodies with or without a slit lamp and that
are equal to or less than one-third depth off the visual axis;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2999 2
(d) The removal of damaged or loose corneal epithelium without the use of a
blade;
(e) Epilation only by forceps;
(f) The expression of conjunctival follicles;
(g) The placement of punctal plugs;
(h) The placement of bandage contact lenses;
(i) The placement of self-retaining amniotic membranes;
(j) Procedures relating to the treatment of blepharitis;
(k) Procedures relating to the treatment of meibomian gland disease;
(l) The therapeutic release of aqueous through a preexisting wound; and
(m) The application of ultraviolet light for components of collagen crosslinking
or light adjustable lens;
(6) The employment of objective or subjective mechanical means to determine the
accommodative or refractive states of the human eye;
(7) The prescription or adaptation of lenses, prisms, devices, or ocular exercises to
correct defects or abnormal conditions of the human eye or vision or to adjust the human eye
to special conditions;
(8) The prescription and fitting of ophthalmic or contact lenses and devices;
(9) The prescription and administration of vision therapy; and
(10) The prescription and administration of low vision care.
2. An optometrist may not perform surgery, including the use of lasers for treatment
of any disease or condition or for the correction of refractive error.
3. As used in this chapter, except as the context may otherwise require, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Eye", the human eye;
(2) "Adnexa", all structures adjacent to the eye and the conjunctiva, lids, lashes, and
lacrimal system;
(3) "Board", the Missouri state board of optometry;
(4) "Diagnostic pharmaceutical agents", topically applied pharmaceuticals used for
the purpose of conducting an examination of the eye, adnexa, and vision;
(5) "Low vision care", the examination, treatment, and management of patients with
visual impairments not treatable by conventional eyewear or contact lenses and may include a
vision rehabilitation program to enhance remaining vision skills;
(6) "Pharmaceutical agents", any diagnostic and therapeutic drug or combination of
drugs that assist the diagnosis, prevention, treatment, or mitigation of abnormal conditions or
symptoms of the human eye, adnexa, and vision;

HB 2999 3
(7) "Therapeutic pharmaceutical agents", those pharmaceuticals, excluding injectable
agents, used for the treatment of conditions or diseases of the eye, adnexa, and vision;
(8) "Vision therapy", a treatment regiment to improve a patient's diagnosed visual
dysfunctions, prevent the development of visual problems, or enhance visual performance to
meet the defined needs of the patient.
✔